Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Article 4. Purposes and Powers.

§ 13.1-626.
Purposes.

Every corporation incorporated under this Act has the purpose of engaging in any lawful business unless a more limited purpose is (i) set forth in the articles of incorporation, or (ii) required to be set forth in the articles of incorporation by §

13.1-620

, or any other law of this Commonwealth.

History.

1985, c. 522.

Law Review.

For article, “The New Virginia Stock Corporation Act: A Primer,” see 20 U. Rich. L. Rev. 67 (1985).

§ 13.1-627.
General powers.

Unless its articles of incorporation provide otherwise, every corporation has perpetual duration and succession in its corporate name and has the same powers as an individual to do all things necessary or convenient to carry out its business and affairs, including, without limitation, power:

To sue and be sued, complain and defend in its corporate name;

To have a corporate seal, which may be altered at will, and to use it, or a facsimile of it, by impressing or affixing it or in any other manner reproducing it;

To make and amend bylaws, not inconsistent with its articles of incorporation or with the laws of the Commonwealth;

To purchase, receive, lease, or otherwise acquire, and own, hold, improve, use and otherwise deal with, real or personal property, or any legal or equitable interest in property, wherever located;

To sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, and otherwise dispose of all or any part of its property;

To purchase, receive, subscribe for, or otherwise acquire, own, hold, vote, use, sell, mortgage, lend, pledge, or otherwise dispose of, and deal in and with shares or other interests in, or obligations of, any other entity;

To make contracts and guarantees, incur liabilities, borrow money, issue its notes, bonds, and other securities and obligations, which may be convertible into or include the option to purchase other securities or property of the corporation, and secure any of its obligations by mortgage or pledge of any of its property, franchises, or income;

To lend money, invest, and reinvest its funds, and receive and hold real and personal property as security for repayment;

To conduct its business, locate offices, and exercise the powers granted by this chapter in or outside of the Commonwealth;

To elect directors and appoint officers, employees, and agents of the corporation, define their duties, fix their compensation, and lend them money and credit;

To pay pensions and establish pension plans, pension trusts, profit sharing plans, share bonus plans, share option plans, share purchase plans and benefit and incentive plans for any or all of the current or former directors, officers, employees, and agents of the corporation or any of its subsidiaries;

To make donations for the public welfare or for religious, charitable, scientific, literary or educational purposes, except that corporations subject to regulation as to rates by the Commission shall not have power to make donations in excess of five percent of net income computed before federal and state taxes on income and without taking into account any deduction for gifts;

Except as otherwise provided in subsection B, to be a promoter, partner, member, associate, or manager of any partnership, joint venture, trust, or other entity;

To make payments or donations, or do any other act, not inconsistent with this section or any other applicable law, that furthers the business and affairs of the corporation;

To pay compensation, or to pay additional compensation, to any or all directors, officers and employees on account of services previously rendered to the corporation, whether or not an agreement to pay such compensation was made before such services were rendered;

To insure for its benefit the life of any of its directors, officers or employees, to insure the life of any shareholder for the purpose of acquiring at his death shares owned by such shareholder and to continue such insurance after the relationship terminates;

To cease its corporate activities and surrender its corporate franchise; and

To have and exercise all powers necessary or convenient to effect any or all of the purposes for which the corporation is organized.

Each corporation other than a public service company, a banking corporation, an insurance corporation, a savings institution, or a credit union shall have power to enter into partnership agreements, joint ventures, or other associations of any kind with any person or persons. The foregoing limitations on public service companies, banking corporations, insurance corporations, savings institutions, and credit unions shall not apply to the purchase by any such entity of any security of a limited liability company. The term “public service company” as used in this subsection shall not apply to railroads, which shall have the power given other corporations generally by this subsection. The foregoing limitation on public service companies shall not apply to partnership agreements, joint ventures, or other associations where the purposes of such partnerships, joint ventures, or other associations are activities that the public service company could lawfully engage in without participation in a partnership, joint venture, or association and will require an equity investment by the public service company and debt with recourse to the public service company of an amount not more than one percent of its net equity as measured at the end of the most recent fiscal year so long as all such partnerships, joint ventures, and associations collectively will require an equity investment by the public service company and debt with recourse to the public service company of less than five percent of the net equity of the public service company as measured at the end of the most recent fiscal year. Upon application by the public service company, the Commission may approve any partnership agreements, joint ventures, or other associations that exceed the equity investment criteria set forth above. The foregoing limitation on public service companies shall not apply to partnership agreements, joint ventures, or other associations between telephone companies and telephone companies, whether in corporate or other form, or between telephone companies and commonly owned affiliates of telephone companies for the purpose of providing domestic cellular radio telecommunication service.

Privileges and powers conferred and restrictions and requirements imposed by other titles of the Code on railroads or other public service companies, banking corporations, insurance corporations, savings and loan associations, credit unions, industrial loan associations, or other special types of corporations, shall not be deemed repealed or amended by any provision of this chapter except where specifically so provided.

Each corporation that is deemed a private foundation, as defined in § 509 of the Internal Revenue Code, unless its articles of incorporation expressly provide otherwise, shall distribute its income and, if necessary, principal, for each taxable year at such time and in such manner as not to subject such corporation to tax under § 4942 of the Internal Revenue Code. Such corporation shall not engage in any act of self-dealing, as defined in § 4941(d) of the Internal Revenue Code, retain any excess business holdings, as defined in § 4943(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, make any investments in such manner as to give rise to liability for the tax imposed by § 4944 of the Internal Revenue Code, or make any taxable expenditures, as defined in § 4945(d) of the Internal Revenue Code. This subsection shall apply to any corporation organized after December 31, 1969, under this chapter or under the Virginia Stock Corporation Act (§

13.1-601

et seq.) enacted by Chapter 428 of the 1956 Acts of General Assembly; and to any corporation organized before January 1, 1970, only for its taxable years beginning on and after January 1, 1972, unless the exceptions provided in § 508(e)(2)(A) or (B) of the Internal Revenue Code shall apply or unless the board of directors of such corporation shall elect that such restrictions as contained in this subsection shall not apply by filing written notice of such election with the Attorney General and the clerk of the Commission on or before December 31, 1971. Each reference to a section of the Internal Revenue Code made in this subsection shall include future amendments to such Code sections and corresponding provisions of future internal revenue laws.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-2.1; 1975, c. 500; 1977, c. 508; 1983, c. 534; 1984, c. 406; 1985, c. 522; 1993, cc. 61, 143, 419; 1994, c. 452; 1996, cc. 16, 257; 2005, c. 765; 2015, c. 611; 2019, c. 734.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765 substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth” in subdivision A 3; in subdivision A 9, substituted “chapter within” for “Act within”; substituted “associations of” for “association of” in subsection B; and substituted “chapter except” for “Act except” in subsection C.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 611 deleted “for managing the business and regulating the affairs of the corporation” at the end of subdivision A 3.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subdivision A 7, inserted “securities and” preceding “obligations, which may”; in subdivision A 9, substituted “chapter in or outside of” for “chapter within or without”; added subdivision A 13; and made stylistic changes.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3A M.J. Canals and Canal Companies, § 6; 4B M.J. Corporations, §§ 34, 44, 46, 201, 207, 209, 214, 215, 240; 14A M.J. Partnership, § 6.

§ 13.1-628.
Emergency powers.

In anticipation of or during an emergency, as described in subsection D of §

13.1-625

, the board of directors of a corporation may:

Modify lines of succession to accommodate the incapacity of any director, officer, employee, or agent; and

Relocate the principal office, designate alternative principal offices or regional offices, or authorize the officers to do so.

During such an emergency, unless emergency bylaws provide otherwise:

Notice of a meeting of the board of directors need be given only to those directors whom it is practicable to reach and may be given in any practicable manner, including by electronic transmission, press release, publication, or radio; and

One or more officers of the corporation present at a meeting of the board of directors may be deemed by a majority of the directors present at the meeting to be directors for the meeting, in order of rank and within the same rank in order of seniority, as necessary to achieve a quorum.

During such an emergency, the board of directors, or, if a quorum cannot be readily convened for a meeting, a majority of the directors present, may:

Take any action that it determines to be practical and necessary to address circumstances of the emergency with respect to a meeting of shareholders notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this chapter or in the articles of incorporation or bylaws, including (i) to postpone any such meeting to a later time or date, with the record date for determining the shareholders entitled to notice of, and to vote at, such meeting applying to the postponed meeting irrespective of §

13.1-660

, unless the board of directors fixes a new record date, and (ii) with respect to a corporation subject to the reporting requirements of § 13(a) or 15(d) of the federal Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, to notify shareholders of any postponement, a change of the place of the meeting, or a change to hold the meeting solely by means of remote communication pursuant to §

13.1-660

.2 solely by a document publicly filed by the corporation with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission pursuant to § 13, 14, or 15(d) of the federal Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended; and

With respect to any distribution that has been declared as to which the record date has not occurred, cancel such distribution, change the amount of such distribution, or change the record date or the payment date to a later date; provided that, in any such case, the corporation gives notice of such action to shareholders as promptly as practicable thereafter, and in any event before the record date theretofore in effect. Such notice, in the case of a corporation subject to the reporting requirements of § 13(a) or 15(d) of the federal Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, may be given solely by a document publicly filed by the corporation with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission pursuant to § 13, 14, or 15(d) of the federal Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended.No person shall be liable and no meeting of shareholders shall be postponed or voided for the failure to make a list of shareholders available pursuant to §

13.1-661

if it was not practicable to allow inspection during such an emergency.

Corporate action taken in good faith during such an emergency under this section to further the ordinary business affairs of the corporation:

Binds the corporation; and

May not be used to impose liability on a director, officer, employee, or agent of the corporation.

History.

1985, c. 522; 2005, c. 765; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only; (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to July 1, 2021, with respect to the name of a stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the distinguishability of its name prior to July 1, 2021, to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765 deleted “of this section” following “subsection D” in subsections A and B; in subdivision C 2, deleted “corporate” following “liability on a” and added “of the corporation.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, effective July 1, 2021, substituted “as described in subsection D of §

13.1-625

” for “defined in subsection D” in subsection A in the introductory language; substituted “During such an emergency” for “During an emergency defined in subsection D” in subsection B in the introductory language; substituted “by electronic transmission, press release, publication, or radio” for “by publication and radio” in subdivision B 1; inserted new subsection C and redesignated former subsection C as subsection D; and deleted former subsection D, which read: “An emergency exists for purposes of this section if a quorum of the corporation’s board of directors cannot readily be assembled because of some catastrophic event.’’ For applicability clause, see Editor’s note.

§ 13.1-629.
Lack of power to act.

Except as provided in subsection B, the validity of corporate action may not be challenged on the ground that the corporation lacks or lacked power to act.

A corporation’s power to act may be challenged:

In a proceeding by a shareholder against the corporation to enjoin the act;

In a proceeding by the corporation, directly, derivatively, or through a receiver, trustee, or other legal representative, against an incumbent or former director, officer, employee, or agent of the corporation; or

In a proceeding against the corporation before the Commission.

In a shareholder’s proceeding under subdivision 1 of subsection B to enjoin an unauthorized corporate act, if equitable and if all affected persons are parties to the proceeding, the court may enjoin or set aside the act and may award damages for loss, except anticipated profits, suffered by the corporation or another party because of enjoining the unauthorized act.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-5; 1956, c. 428; 1985, c. 522; 2019, c. 734.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subsection A, substituted “the validity of” for “of this section”; in subsection C, deleted “of this section” preceding “to enjoin,” and inserted “if equitable and if all affected persons are parties to the proceeding”; and made stylistic changes.